Utah statutes.
31A-22-426.   Coverage description.

(1)  Each life insurance policy, annuity contract, and certificate of life insurance shall contain a brief description printed on the cover page.

(2)  The description shall include:

(a)  the type of insurance;

(b)  whether it is participating or nonparticipating;

(c)  a significant limitation stated or included in the filed policy, contract, or certificate; and

(d)  a significant specific feature stated or included in the filed policy, contract, or certificate.

